California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The production and marketing of tomatoes constitutes an important industry of this state that provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78602.

The maintenance of the tomato industry of California is necessary to assure the public of a continuous supply of this vital product and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those engaged in the tomato industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78603.

The production of tomatoes in California has the potential to be one of the leading segments of the state’s agricultural industry. To realize this potential, there is a need to make consumers aware of the nutritional value of tomatoes, the high quality of tomatoes produced by the industry, and the versatility of tomatoes as part of a well-balanced diet. The activities made possible by the establishment of the commission will meet this need and further the interests of the industry and the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78604.

The establishment of the commission is necessary for the efficient creation and management of a research program to develop improved varieties of tomatoes, an integrated approach to control pests and diseases common to tomatoes, and more efficient cultural practices. In addition, the commission is necessary to carry out the California tomato industry’s commitment to the efficient development and management of a national and international advertising and promotion program which, combined with the research program, will enhance the competitiveness of the California tomato industry within the national and international marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78605.

The successes that the tomato industry of California have enjoyed have come in part through a commitment to industry funded production research that has led to significant improvements in the quality and variety of the tomatoes available to consumers. It has also led to tomatoes being a better consumer value. The establishment of the commission will continue and enhance this research effort and move the tomato industry toward its potential, resulting in increased consumer value and enhanced grower returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78606.

The production and marketing of tomatoes in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purposes of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78607.

No action taken by the commission, or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78608.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78609.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that commission members and alternates are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78610.

Opportunity exists for continued growth and expansion of the tomato industry by creating new markets in major portions of this country. The success of such an expansion program is uniquely dependent upon effective advertising, promotion, and research, since the creation of new markets is essentially a matter of educating and informing people of the use, nutritional value, and availability of the commodity. The expansion of the tomato industry also provides an important source of jobs for many people in this state, a high proportion of whom reside in historically depressed areas of the state, and serves to ensure the preservation of an agrarian society.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78611.

The commission form of administration created by this chapter is uniquely situated to provide those engaged in the production of tomatoes the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action of the broad fields of development, maintenance, and expansion of markets, marketing research, advertising and promotion, and production and processing research necessary to achieve the purposes stated herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [78620. - 78636.]

78620.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78621.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78622.

“Commission” means the California Tomato Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78623.

“Districts” shall consist of the following:

(a) District 1 consists of Imperial and Riverside Counties.

(b) District 2 consists of Los Angeles, Orange, San Diego, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, and Ventura Counties.

(c) District 3 consists of Fresno, Kern, Kings, and Tulare Counties.

(d) District 4 consists of Monterey County.

(e) District 5 consists of Madera, Merced, and Stanislaus Counties.

(f) District 6 consists of San Joaquin County.

(g) District 7 consists of all counties in the State of California.

The boundaries of any district may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the commission, which is concurred in by the secretary. These boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

78624.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78625.

“Fresh” means tomatoes, in any form, which have not been subject to heat processing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78626.

“Handle” means to engage in the operation of selling, marketing, or distributing fresh market tomatoes that have been produced, or purchased or acquired from a producer, or which are marketed on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise, but shall not include retailing except for fresh market tomatoes not previously subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78627.

“Handler” or “shipper” means any person, other than a common carrier, who handles a quantity of 250,000 pounds or more of tomatoes during a marketing season.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78628.

“Market” or “marketing” means to sell or otherwise distribute tomatoes into commercial channels or trade resulting in the sale of tomatoes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78629.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the sale of tomatoes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78630.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” are synonymous terms and mean the period beginning March 1 of any year and extending through the last day of February of the following year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78631.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, firm, company, or other entity doing business in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78632.

“Producer” and “grower” are synonymous terms and mean any person who produces, or causes to be produced, tomatoes in a quantity of 250,000 pounds or more delivered to handlers during the marketing season.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78633.

“Production research” means any research relating to the production, harvest, and post harvest handling of tomatoes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78634.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78635.

“Ship” and “shipping” are synonymous terms and mean the operations of receiving, grading, cleaning, transporting, distributing, or otherwise preparing for market or marketing, tomatoes for fresh consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78636.

(a) “Tomatoes” means all tomatoes that are produced for commercial purposes and are handled within the state in fresh form, except cherry tomatoes and tomatoes grown in a greenhouse.

(b) For purposes of this section, “tomatoes grown in a greenhouse” means tomatoes grown in a fixed steel structure using irrigation and climate control, in an artificial medium that substitutes for soil.

(c) Cherry tomatoes and tomatoes grown in a greenhouse may be included in the definition of tomatoes in subdivision (a) if approved by the producers and handlers of those tomatoes pursuant to a referendum conducted in accordance with the procedures in Article 5 (commencing with Section 78690) of Part 2 of Division 22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Tomato Commission [78640. - 78657.]

78640.

There is in the state government the California Tomato Commission. The commission shall be composed of 10 producers, seven handlers, and may include one public member, at the discretion of the commission.

(a) Producers within the respective districts shall elect one producer from District 1, one producer from District 2, one producer from District 3, one producer from District 4, one producer from District 5, one producer from District 6, and four at-large producers from District 7.

(b) Handlers within Districts 1 to 6, inclusive, shall elect one handler from each district and one at-large handler from District 7.

(c) The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission.

(d) The secretary and other appropriate individuals, as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

78641.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease those activities or functions or to make the corrections as required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Actions of the commission in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, his or her reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78642.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78643.

When the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall give his or her response to the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision. The secretary’s response may be a requirement that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78644.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, a court may, if it finds that the secretary acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78645.

Except for ex officio members, an alternate for each member shall be elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate shall, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate, serve in place of the member and shall have and be able to exercise all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of a change in status making a member ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate shall act as a member of the commission until a qualified successor is elected or appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78646.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to the commission as a member or alternate to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal or resignation, shall be filled by another eligible person for the unexpired portion of the term by a majority vote of the remaining members of the commission. The person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the person whose office he or she is to occupy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78647.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of the public member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification, shall be filled by another eligible person for the unexpired portion of the term by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission. The person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to occupy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78648.

Any producer member and his or her alternate on the commission shall be an individual producer or an employee or representative of a producer who has a financial interest in producing or causing to be produced, tomatoes for market. Qualifications of producer members and their alternates shall be maintained during their entire term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78649.

Any handler member and his or her alternate on the commission shall be an individual handler or an employee or representative of a handler who has a financial interest in handling tomatoes for market. Qualifications of handler members and their alternates shall be maintained during their entire term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78650.

The public member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member or alternate, respectively, on the commission. The public member and his or her alternate member shall not have any financial interest in the tomato industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78651.

The term of office of all members and alternates on the commission, except ex officio members, shall be two years from the beginning of the marketing season in the year of their election and until qualified successors are elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78652.

The commission shall be, and is hereby declared and created, a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78653.

A quorum of the commission shall be six voting producer members and four voting handler members. Except as provided in Section 78723, the vote of a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78654.

The secretary or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meetings of the commission. However, the secretary or his or her representative is not entitled to attend an executive session of the commission or a committee of the commission called for the purpose of discussing potential or actual litigation against the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78655.

No member or alternate of the commission or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission shall receive a salary. Each member of the commission and each alternate serving in place of a member, except ex officio members who are officers or employees of a public agency, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive reasonable and necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances as approved by the commission for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78656.

All funds received by any person from the assessments levied under this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks that the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents as it may designate for that purpose. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in an amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78657.

The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof, is personally liable for the contracts of the commission. No member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually in any way to any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof. Liability is several and not joint, and no member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof, is liable for the default of any other member or alternate of the commission, or any employee or agent thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [78660. - 78682.]

78660.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of those contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78661.

The commission may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, and orders in accordance with commission procedures for purposes of carrying out this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule, regulation, operating procedure, or order of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78662.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary, to promote and maintain the tomato industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78663.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and such other officers as it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78664.

The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel of its choice, necessary to carry out this chapter. If any person employed by the commission engages in any conduct that the secretary determines is not in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action, be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person.

The commission may retain a management firm or the staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state or federal government to perform the functions prescribed by this section under the direction of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78665.

The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78666.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78667.

The commission may establish offices and incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary in the opinion of the commission for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78668.

The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. A summary of the audit shall be reported to all persons subject to this chapter, a copy of which shall also be submitted to the department. In addition, the secretary may, as he or she determines necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78669.

The commission may present facts to, and negotiate with, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters that affect the tomato industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78670.

The commission may promote the sale of tomatoes by advertising and any other promotional means, including cost-sharing advertising, for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for tomatoes, and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses, healthful properties, and nutritional value of tomatoes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78671.

The commission may educate and instruct the wholesale and retail trade with respect to proper methods of handling and selling tomatoes, and conduct market surveys and analyses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78672.

The commission may conduct, and contract with others to conduct, scientific research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from research or elsewhere, respecting cultural and production practices, and marketing and distribution of tomatoes. The results of any research conducted by or on behalf of the commission may be used by the commission in any way it deems appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78673.

The commission may make in its name, contracts to receive and render services in formulating and conducting plans and programs and other contracts or agreements that the commission may deem necessary for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78674.

The commission may solicit and accept contributions of, or match private, state, or federal funds, and employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies for purposes of promoting and maintaining the tomato industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 373, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

78675.

The commission may collect information, including, but not limited to, industry crop statistics, and publish and distribute without charge, a bulletin or other communication to persons subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78676.

The commission shall establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78677.

The commission shall establish an annual budget according to generally accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the secretary prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to Section 78665.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78678.

The commission shall submit to the secretary for his or her concurrence an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78679.

The commission and the secretary shall keep confidential and shall not disclose, except when required by court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding, all lists of persons subject to this chapter in their possession. However, the commission shall establish procedures to provide producers and handlers access to communication with other producers and handlers regarding noncommercial matters affecting the commission and persons subject to its jurisdiction. The access shall not include the actual release of the list of the names and addresses of producers and handlers in the possession of the commission or the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78681.

(a) In order to prevent unfair trade practices that are detrimental to California’s tomato industry, including, but not limited to, deception and misinformation, the commission may collect and disseminate to any and all interested persons, historical handler packout information, including, but not limited to, tomato grade and size.

(b) The identity of each handler reporting information and the information reported under this section shall be kept confidential and shall not be made public under any circumstances. Information that gives industry totals, averages, and other similar data may be disclosed by the commission.

(c) The procedure for the collection and dissemination of information pursuant to this section shall be approved by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78682.

The commission may administer any government program that is engaged in the activities authorized by this chapter and that directly and exclusively affects the fresh tomato industry, upon the request of an authorized agent of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 399, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [78690. - 78698.]

78690.

(a) Within 15 days of the effective date of this chapter, the secretary shall establish a list of producers and handlers eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the secretary may require that producers and handlers submit the names and mailing addresses of all producers and handlers. The secretary also may require that the information provided include the quantity of tomatoes produced by each producer and the quantity of tomatoes handled by each handler, or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum vote specified in Section 78691. The request for the information shall be in writing and shall be filed within 10 days following receipt of the request.

(b) Any producer whose name does not appear on the appropriate list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement, identifying himself or herself as a producer or handler. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the person from paying assessments, and does not invalidate any industry votes conducted pursuant to this article.

(c) Proponents and opponents of the commission may contact producers on the lists in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary if all expenses associated with those contacts are paid in advance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 130.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

78691.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds the following in a referendum vote conducted by the secretary:

(a) At least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting sold a majority of the total quantity of tomatoes in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting sold 65 percent or more of the total quantity of tomatoes in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) At least 40 percent of the total number of handlers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate and that either of the following occurs:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled a majority of the total quantity of tomatoes in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled 65 percent or more of the total quantity of tomatoes in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78692.

In finding whether the commission is approved pursuant to this article, the vote of any nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association that is authorized by its members to so vote, shall be considered as being the approval or rejection by the individual members of, or the individual stockholders in, the nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78693.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78694.

Nonreceipt of a ballot by an eligible person shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78695.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 78691, the secretary shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all affected producers and handlers whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78696.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in Section 78691, the secretary shall certify and declare all provisions of this chapter inoperative. The secretary may conduct other implementation referendum votes one year or more after the previous vote has been taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

78697.
